Vermont, session 2025-2026, H623.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 123 is amended to read:
§ 123. DUTIES OF OFFICE
* * *
(j)(1) The Office may inquire into the criminal background histories of
applicants for initial licensure and for license renewal of any Office-issued
credential, including a license, certification, registration, or specialty
designation for the following professions:
* * *
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 2 of 11
(N) peer support providers and peer recovery support specialists
certified under 26 V.S.A. chapter 60; and
(O) community-based perinatal doulas certified under 26 V.S.A. chapter
84.; and
(P) massage therapists licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 105.
Sec. 2. REPEAL
26 V.S.A. chapter 105 (Massage Therapists, Bodyworkers, and Touch
Professionals) is repealed on July 1, 2027.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. chapter 105 is added to read:
CHAPTER 105. MASSAGE THERAPISTS
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 5401. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional
Regulation.
(2)(A) “Establishment” means any place of business:
(i) that offers the practice of massage or where the practice of
massage is conducted on the premises of the business;
(ii) where two or more persons, regardless of employee or
contractor status, regularly engage in the practice of massage; or
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 3 of 11
(iii) that represents itself to the public by any title or description of
services incorporating the words “massage,” “massage therapy,” “massage
therapist,” “massage practitioner,” “massagist,” “masseur,” “masseuse,” or
other words defined by the Director in rules.
(B) A “place of business” includes any office, clinic, facility, salon,
spa, or other location not otherwise exempted under this chapter where two or
more persons engage in the practice of massage.
(3) “License” means a current authorization granted by the Director
permitting the practice of massage therapy.
(4)(A) “Massage” means systems of structured touch that are:
(i)(I) applied to the superficial, soft or deep tissue, muscle, or
connective tissue of another person by manual means, including friction,
gliding, rocking, tapping, kneading, and nonspecific stretching; or
(II) designed to affect the energy fields of the body for the
purpose of promoting and maintaining health and well-being; and
(ii) provided to clients in a manner in which the clients have a
reasonable expectation of privacy.
(B) “Massage” may include the use of therapies such as heliotherapy
or hydrotherapy; the use of moist, hot, and cold external applications; and the
use of oils or other lubricants.
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 4 of 11
(C) “Massage” does not include the diagnosis of illness, disease,
impairment, or disability.
(5) “Massage therapist” means a person who holds a license from the
Office to practice massage.
(6) “Practice of massage” means offering or engaging in massage in
exchange for consideration.
§ 5402. PROHIBITIONS
(a) An individual shall not engage in or offer the practice of massage unless
the individual is licensed with the Office.
(b) It shall be a violation of this chapter for any individual to engage in the
practice of massage, or to offer to engage in the practice of massage, if the
individual’s license has been suspended or revoked.
(c) An individual shall not use in connection with the individual’s name
any letters, words, titles, or insignia indicating or implying that the individual
is offering or engaging in the practice of massage, including the term “massage
therapist,” unless the individual holds a license in accordance with this chapter.
§ 5403. UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE
It is unauthorized practice, punishable under 3 V.S.A. § 127:
(1) to engage in the practice of massage without an individual license
from the Office; or
(2) to own or operate an unlicensed establishment.
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 5 of 11
§ 5404. EXEMPTIONS
The following individuals shall not require a license under this chapter:
(1) a student who is practicing massage as part of a professional
massage education program; or
(2) a professional who is licensed, registered, or certified under this title
and acting within the professional’s scope of practice.
Subchapter 2. Administration
§ 5405. DUTIES OF THE DIRECTOR
(a) Generally. The Director shall:
(1) provide general information to applicants for licensure as a massage
therapist or for a massage therapy establishment;
(2) receive applications for licensure and provide licenses to applicants
qualified under this chapter;
(3) administer fees as established by law;
(4) refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;
(5) renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative
law officer; and
(6) explain complaint procedures to the public.
(b) Rules.
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 6 of 11
(1) The Director shall adopt rules requiring an individual or
establishment licensee to disclose to each new client before the first treatment
the following information:
(A) the professional qualifications and experience of the licensee;
(B) actions that constitute unprofessional conduct;
(C) the method for filing a complaint against a licensee; and
(D) the method for making a consumer inquiry with the Office.
(2) The Director shall adopt rules regarding the display of:
(A) the licenses of employed or contracted massage therapists at an
establishment; and
(B) information regarding unprofessional conduct and filing
complaints with the Office.
(3) The rules described in this subsection shall include provisions
relating to the manner in which the information disclosed shall be distributed
or displayed and a requirement that a licensee and the client sign an
acknowledgement that the information was disclosed.
(4) The Director may adopt other rules as necessary to perform the
duties under this chapter.
§ 5406. ADVISOR APPOINTEES
(a) The Secretary of State shall appoint three advisors who are licensed
massage therapists who have been actively engaged in the practice of massage,
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 7 of 11
as described in this chapter, to advise the Director on matters relating to the
practice of massage.
(b) The Secretary shall appoint the advisors to serve, at the Secretary’s
pleasure, for five-year staggered terms. To stagger the advisors’ terms, the
Secretary may initially appoint two of the advisors for less than a five-year
term.
Subchapter 3. Licenses
§ 5407. APPLICATION
An applicant for licensure as a massage therapist shall:
(1) be at least 18 years of age;
(2) be a graduate of a professional massage therapy education program
of 650 hours of instruction accredited by a national accreditation agency or
approved by the Director;
(3) pass an examination approved by the Director; and
(4) provide proof of current professional liability insurance, in
accordance with rules developed by the Director.
§ 5408. LICENSURE BY ENDORSEMENT
The Director may issue a license to an individual under this chapter if the
individual holds a license or other authorization to practice massage therapy
from a U.S. or Canadian jurisdiction that the Director finds has requirements
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 8 of 11
for the practice of massage therapy that are substantially equivalent to those
under this chapter.
§ 5409. ESTABLISHMENTS; LICENSURE AND INSPECTION
(a) Each establishment that employs or contracts with more than one
massage therapist shall apply for an establishment license under this chapter
and shall pay the required fee. An individual who is the sole person who
practices massage therapy in an establishment shall not be required to obtain
an establishment license for that establishment.
(b) An applicant for licensure as an establishment shall meet standards
adopted by the Director by rule. The Director may require that an application
for establishment licensure include:
(1) the ownership of the business;
(2) the name, location, and licensing history of any past or present
establishment under the same ownership;
(3) the location and ownership of the establishment’s premises;
(4) proof of business licensure with the Secretary of State;
(5) proof of current professional liability insurance, in accordance with
rules developed by the Director; and
(6) other information required by the Director in rule.
(c) An establishment shall have a designated massage therapist licensed
under this chapter who shall be professionally responsible for the overall
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 9 of 11
cleanliness and sanitation of the establishment and for legal requirements
relating to the operation of the establishment and who shall ensure that the
establishment’s license is conspicuously displayed for clients.
(d) A person authorized by the Director may enter any establishment for
the purpose of inspection. A fee shall not be charged for any inspection under
this subsection.
§ 5410. LICENSE RENEWAL
(a) A license under this chapter shall be renewed every two years by
submission of a new, completed application and shall be accompanied by
payment of the required fee.
(b) A license that has lapsed shall be renewed upon payment of the biennial
renewal fee and the late renewal penalty.
(c) A licensee shall complete a number of continuing education hours as
determined by rule by the Director.
§ 5411. FEES
Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay those fees set
forth in 3 V.S.A. § 125(b).
§ 5412. LICENSURE GENERALLY; DISPLAY OF LICENSE
(a) The Director shall issue a license or renew a license, upon payment of
the fees required under this chapter, to an applicant or licensee who has
satisfactorily met all the requirements of this chapter.
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 10 of 11
(b) An individual and an establishment granted a license shall
conspicuously display the license for clients in the principal office, place of
business, or place of employment.
§ 5413. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
Unprofessional conduct means the conduct set forth in 3 V.S.A. § 129a and
the following:
(1) engaging in activities in violation of 13 V.S.A. § 2605 (voyeurism);
(2) engaging with a client in sexual conduct as defined in 13 V.S.A.
§ 2821:
(A) in an establishment; or
(B) while engaged in the practice of massage with a client;
(3) conviction of a crime committed while engaged in the practice of
massage;
(4) performing massage that the massage therapist knows or has reason
to know has not been authorized by a client or the client’s legal representative;
(5) practicing massage therapy in an unlicensed establishment; and
(6) engaging in conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud, or
harm the public.
Sec. 4. TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Director of the Office of Professional
Regulation shall establish a procedure so that an individual who has been
VT LEG #385790 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.623
2026 Page 11 of 11
engaged in the practice of massage therapy may become licensed on the
effective date of this act without meeting the education and examination
requirements for licensure set forth in this chapter if the Director, after due
consultation with the massage advisor appointees, determines that the
individual demonstrates through a peer-review process and production of such
documentation as the Director may require that the individual possesses both
significant experience and massage therapy competencies substantially
equivalent to those of an individual eligible for licensure pursuant to this
chapter.
(b) Any individual licensed under this section shall thereafter be eligible
for license renewal pursuant to 26 V.S.A. § 5410.
(c) The ability of an individual to become licensed under this section shall
expire on July 1, 2028.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Sec. 4 (transitional provisions) shall take effect on
passage.
(b) The remaining sections shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385790 v.1